South Dakota, session 2026, HB1288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 45-6-65 be AMENDED:
45-6-65. An operator shall obtain a license to mine:
(1) Sand;
(2) Gravel;
(3) Rock to be crushed and used in construction;
(4) Pegmatite minerals;
(5) Limestone; and
(6) Iron ore, gypsum, shale, pozzolan, and other materials used in the process of
making cement or lime.
The operator shall comply with the requirements of §§ 45-6-68, 45-6-69, 45-6-71,
and 45-6-72, and section 2 of this Act, for each site to be mined. Failure to comply with
these requirements for each site mined constitutes mining without a license.
The fee for the license is one hundred dollars annually, for each mine site
authorized under the license. The department shall forward any fees collected under this
section to the state treasurer for deposit in the environment and natural resources fee
fund established in § 1-41-23.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 45-6:
Any county or first or second class municipality, which has adopted a
comprehensive plan, may adopt ordinances or requirements that govern sand, gravel, and
aggregate mining operations and are not inconsistent or in conflict with applicable state
laws or administrative rules.
A county or first or second class municipality may not require additional bonds or
sureties, if the same are required by state law or administrative rule. The Board of Minerals
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.967.11 2 1288
and Environment may not grant a permit for a mining operation unless the applicant has
complied with all county or city ordinances and requirements and obtained necessary
county or city permits.
If the applicant has substantially complied with the procedure for obtaining any
necessary county or city permits but has not obtained permits due to administrative delay,
the Board of Minerals and Environment may grant a mining permit that is conditioned
upon the issuance of all necessary county or city permits within sixty days of the date of
the board's issuance of the conditioned mining permit.
If a county or municipality has adopted an ordinance governing mining operations,
any proceedings of and any action taken by the county or municipality with regard to the
proposed mining operation may be considered by the Board of Minerals and Environment
before the issuance or denial of a permit pursuant to this chapter, including a permit
conditioned upon the issuance of all necessary county or city permits.
No mining operations may be commenced under a permit conditioned upon the
issuance of all necessary county or city permits until the Board of Minerals and
Environment is notified by the applicant in writing that the required county or city permits
have been obtained by the applicant.
Section 3. That § 45-6B-4 be AMENDED:
45-6B-4. Any county or first or second class municipality which has adopted a
comprehensive plan and zoning ordinances may adopt ordinances or requirements
governing mining operations which are not inconsistent or in conflict with applicable state
laws or administrative rules. However, such a county or municipality may not require
additional bonds or sureties if the same are required by state law or administrative rule.
The Board of Minerals and Environment may not grant a permit for a mining operation
unless the applicant has complied with all county or city ordinances and requirements and
obtained necessary county or city permits. However, if the applicant has substantially
complied with the procedure for obtaining any necessary county or city permits but has
not obtained such permits due to administrative delay, the Board of Minerals and
Environment may grant a mining permit which is conditioned upon the issuance of all
necessary county or city permits within sixty days of the date of the board's issuance of
the conditioned mining permit. If a county or municipality has adopted an ordinance
governing mining operations, any proceedings of and any action taken by the county or
municipality with regard to the proposed mining operation may be considered by the Board
of Minerals and Environment before the issuance or denial of a permit pursuant to this
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.967.11 3 1288
chapter, including a permit conditioned upon the issuance of all necessary county or city
permits.
No mining operations may be commenced under a permit conditioned upon the
issuance of all necessary county or city permits until the Board of Minerals and
Environment is notified by the applicant in writing that the required county or city permits
have been obtained by the applicant.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.